Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.220

Sale of unclaimed estate—Remittance of proceeds to department of revenue.

If the estate remains in the hands of the agent unclaimed for three years, any property not in the form of cash shall be sold under order of the court, and all funds, after deducting a reasonable sum for expenses and services of the agent, to be fixed by the court, shall be paid into the county treasury. The county treasurer shall issue triplicate receipts therefor, one of which shall be filed with the county auditor, one with the court, and one with the department of revenue. If the funds remain in the county treasury unclaimed for a period of four years and ninety days, the county treasurer shall forthwith remit them to the department of revenue for deposit in the state treasury in the fund in which escheats and forfeitures are by law required to be deposited.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 10; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.220. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 7 s 4; 1917 c 156 s 167; RRS s 1537.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.

Escheats: Chapter 11.08 RCW.